District of Columbia statutes.
22-1102

Refusal or neglect of guardian to provide for child under 14 years of age.

Any person within the District of Columbia, of sufficient financial ability, who shall refuse or neglect to provide for any child under the age of 14 years, of which he or she shall be the parent or guardian, such food, clothing, and shelter as will prevent the suffering and secure the safety of such child, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be subject to punishment by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or by imprisonment in the Workhouse of the District of Columbia for not more than 3 months, or both such fine and imprisonment.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1095, ch. 847, § 4
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 212, 60 DCR 2064
Intrafamily offense proceedings, see § 16-1001 et seq.
This section is referenced in § 16-801.
1981 Ed., § 22-902.
1973 Ed., § 22-902.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $100”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 212 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.